Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.087

Youth who have been diverted—Alleged prostitution or prostitution loitering offenses—Services and treatment.

Within available funding, when a youth who has been diverted under RCW 13.40.070 for an alleged offense of prostitution or prostitution loitering is referred to the department, the department shall connect that youth with the services and treatment specified in RCW * 74.14B.060 and 74.14B.070.

[ 2010 c 289 s 5.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 74.14B.060 was repealed by 2012 c 29 s 14.